Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.305

Rule making—Exemptions.

Rule-making proceedings conducted under this chapter are exempt from compliance with RCW 34.05.310 and the provisions of chapter 19.85 RCW, the regulatory fairness act, when adoption of the rule is determined by a referendum vote of the affected parties.

[ 2002 c 313 s 109.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.